Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3660 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an insurer may not:
1. Refuse to continue to insure or provide coverage to an
individual or limit the amount, extent, or kind of coverage
available to an individual because the individual is widowed or the
individual's marital status otherwise reflects the death of a
spouse; or

Req. No. 14373 Page 1

2. Charge an individual who is widowed or whose marital status
otherwise reflects the death of a spouse a rate that is different
from the rate that would be charged if the individual's marital
status was married.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14373 MJ 12/05/25

















Req. No. 14373 Page 2